Florida, session 2026, SB1468.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.â(1)âThe Legislature finds that the discharge of 17 inadequately treated wastewater and aging sewage disposal 18 facilities compromise the quality of the environment, including 19 freshwater, brackish water, and nearshore and offshore salt 20 waters, and threatens the quality of life and local economies in 21 this state that depend on those resources. The Legislature 22 further finds that requiring advanced wastewater treatment or 23 better at all sewage disposal facilities with a permitted 24 capacity of greater than 1 million gallons per day in this state 25 is a necessary long-term investment that will fundamentally 26 improve wastewater treatment. 27 (2)âBy July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, sewage 28 disposal facilities with a permitted capacity of greater than 1 29 million gallons per day in this state shall report to the 30 Department of Environmental Protection all of the following: 31 (a)âYear of construction for the facility and any 32 maintenance or upgrades. 33 (b)âTotal permitted volume of water treated daily. 34 (c)âActual permitted volume of water treated daily, 35 including the most recent 1-year and 5-year averages. 36 (d)âCurrent level of treatment, including concentrations 37 for each of the following: 38 1.âBiochemical oxygen demand. 39 2.âSuspended solids. 40 3.âTotal nitrogen. 41 4.âTotal phosphorus. 42 5.âPerfluorooctanoic acid. 43 6.âPerfluorooctanesulfonic acid. 44 7.âMolybdenum. 45 8.âOther contaminants of emerging concern as determined by 46 the department. 47 (e)âEstimated total pollutant loading based on permitted 48 volume and concentrations. 49 (f)âDisposal methods and the volume discharged to any 50 receiving waterbodies, if applicable, pursuant to s. 51 403.064(16), Florida Statutes. 52 (g)âTotal volume and concentration of any permitted and 53 nonpermitted wastewater spills since 2010. 54 (h)âElevation of the facility and supporting 55 infrastructure. 56 (i)âLocation within a floodplain, flood zone, or coastal 57 high-hazard area and, if applicable, the corresponding zone 58 number. 59 (3)âIn order to prioritize the upgrade of sewage disposal 60 facilities and investments in wastewater infrastructure, by 61 December 31, 2027, and annually thereafter, the department, in 62 consultation with the water management districts and sewage 63 disposal facilities, shall submit to the Governor, the President 64 of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives a 65 report detailing all of the following for all sewage disposal 66 facilities with a permitted capacity of greater than 1 million 67 gallons per day in this state and post the annual report on its 68 website: 69 (a)âYear of construction for the facility and any 70 maintenance or upgrades. 71 (b)âTotal permitted volume of water treated daily. 72 (c)âActual permitted volume of water treated daily, 73 including the most recent 1-year and 5-year averages. 74 (d)âCurrent level of treatment, including concentrations 75 for each of the following: 76 1.âBiochemical oxygen demand. 77 2.âSuspended solids. 78 3.âTotal nitrogen. 79 4.âTotal phosphorus. 80 5.âPerfluorooctanoic acid. 81 6.âPerfluorooctanesulfonic acid. 82 7.âMolybdenum. 83 8.âOther contaminants of emerging concern as determined by 84 the department. 85 (e)âEstimated total pollutant loading based on permitted 86 volume and concentrations. 87 (f)âDisposal methods and the volume discharged to any 88 receiving waterbodies, if applicable, pursuant to s. 89 403.064(16), Florida Statutes. 90 (g)âImpairment status of any receiving waterbodies within 91 the watershed. 92 (h)âImplementation status of total maximum daily loads and 93 basin management action plans and assigned reductions for load 94 allocations and wasteload allocations for pollutants of concern. 95 (i)âTotal volume and concentration of any permitted and 96 nonpermitted wastewater spills since 2010. 97 (j)âElevation of the facility and supporting 98 infrastructure. 99 (k)âLocation within a floodplain, flood zone, or coastal 100 high-hazard area and, if applicable, the corresponding zone 101 number. 102 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.